District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.05

Publication of the Comprehensive Plan.

(a)

Within 90 days of March 8, 2007, the Mayor shall publish the Comprehensive Plan, as amended, in its entirety.

(b)

The Comprehensive Plan shall be consolidated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents into a single new or replacement title of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations to be designated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents. The Comprehensive Plan shall be published in the format furnished by the Mayor and need not conform to the Office of Documents’ publication standards.

(c)

Within 90 days of April 8, 2011, the Mayor shall publish the Comprehensive Plan, as amended, in its entirety. The Comprehensive Plan shall be consolidated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents into a single new or replacement title of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations to be designated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents. The Comprehensive Plan shall be published in the format furnished by the Mayor and need not conform to the Office of Documents’ publication standards.

History

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 9a
as added Oct. 6, 1994, D.C. Law 10-193, § 3(a)(3), 41 DCR 5536
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(d), 46 DCR 1441
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-300, § 2(d), 54 DCR 924
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-361, § 201(b), 58 DCR 908

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-301.66.
1981 Ed., § 1-248.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-300 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (b).
D.C. Law 18-361 added subsec. (c).

Effective Dates

For effective date of District elements of Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-306.02.